Utah statutes.
17-33-7.   Functions of county office of personnel management -- Personnel
functions of county agencies, departments, or offices.
(1) (a)  The county office of personnel management shall perform the functions
required by this Subsection (1).
(b)  The county executive, county legislative body, and county office of
personnel management may not delegate those functions to a separate county
agency, office, or department.
(c)  The county office of personnel management shall:
(i)  design and administer a county pay plan that includes salaries, wages,
incentives, bonuses, leave, insurance, retirement, and other benefits;
(ii)  design and administer the county classification plan and grade
allocation system, including final decisions on position classification and
grade allocation;
(iii)  conduct position classification studies, including periodic desk
audits, except that an agency, department, or office may submit classification
recommendations to the county office of personnel management;
(iv)  maintain registers of publicly recruited applicants and certification of
top-ranking eligible applicants;
(v)  monitor county agency, department, or office personnel practices to
determine compliance with equal opportunity and affirmative action guidelines;
and
(vi)  maintain central personnel records.
(d)  The county legislative body may approve, amend, or reject the pay plan.
(2)  County agencies, departments, or offices shall:
(a)  establish initial job descriptions;
(b)  recommend position classifications and grade allocations;
(c)  make final selections for appointments and promotions to vacant
positions;
(d)  conduct performance evaluations;
(e)  discipline employees; and
(f)  perform other functions approved by the county executive, and agreed to
by the county agency, office, or department.
